Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.628

[Art. 77] Principals.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Commits an offense punishable by this code, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, or procures its commission; or

(2) Causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him or her would be punishable by this code;

is a principal.

[ 2011 c 336 s 774; 1963 c 220 s 76.]